mn_MN.aff
FLAG long
SFX 3E Y 10
SFX 3E иг гүүд/070873 иг	+PL
SFX 3E эв вүүд/070873 эв	+PL
SFX 3E эг гүүд/070873 эг	+PL
SFX 3E эс сүүд/070873 эс	+PL
SFX 3E 0 нүүд/040873 [ийеэ]	+PL
SFX 3E иг гүүдийнх/070873 иг	+PL
SFX 3E эв вүүдийнх/070873 эв	+PL
SFX 3E эг гүүдийнх/070873 эг	+PL
SFX 3E эс сүүдийнх/070873 эс	+PL
SFX 3E 0 нүүдийнх/040873 [ийеэ]	+PL

SFX 00 Y 20
SFX 00 ад даа [^джзстхчш][дц]ад
SFX 00 ад даа [джзстхчш][^мнглбврдцауя]ад
SFX 00 ад даа [^джзстхчш][^мнглбврдцауя]ад
SFX 00 0 аа [мнглбвр][мнглбвр]ад
SFX 00 ид даа [жчш]ид
SFX 00 0 аа [^жчш]ид
SFX 00 0 аа [джзстхчш][дц][аи]д
SFX 00 0 аа [аиеяуй]нд
SFX 00 0 аа [^дайиятжзсшцчхмнгбвркфл]
SFX 00 0 аа -д
SFX 00 0 гаа [иая]а
SFX 00 0 аа [гн]ад
SFX 00 0 аа [дтжзсшцчхмглбвркфьйе]д
SFX 00 0 аа [уая][уа]д
SFX 00 0 аа [тжзсшцчхмнгбвркф]
SFX 00 ал лаа [^джзтчцш]тал
SFX 00 0 аа [джзтчцш]тал
SFX 00 0 аа [^т].л
SFX 00 0 а [^иа][иая]
SFX 00 0 гаа й

SFX 01 Y 20
SFX 01 од доо [^джзстхчш][дц]од
SFX 01 од доо [джзстхчш][^мнглбврдцоуё]од
SFX 01 од доо [^джзстхчш][^мнглбврдцоуё]од
SFX 01 0 оо [мнглбвр][мнглбвр]од
SFX 01 ид доо [жчш]ид
SFX 01 0 оо [^жчш]ид
SFX 01 0 оо [джзстхчш][дц][ои]д
SFX 01 0 оо [оиеёуюй]нд
SFX 01 0 оо [^дойиётжзсшцчхмнгбвркфл]
SFX 01 0 оо -д
SFX 01 0 гоо [иоё]о
SFX 01 0 оо [гн]од
SFX 01 0 оо [дтжзсшцчхмглбвркфьйе]д
SFX 01 0 оо [уоё][уо]д
SFX 01 0 оо [тжзсшцчхмнгбвркф]
SFX 01 ол лоо [^джзтчцш]тол
SFX 01 0 оо [джзтчцш]тол
SFX 01 0 оо [^т].л
SFX 01 0 о [^ио][иоё]
SFX 01 0 гоо й

SFX 02 Y 20
SFX 02 өд дөө [^джзстхчш][дц]өд
SFX 02 өд дөө [джзстхчш][^мнглбврдцөүе]өд
SFX 02 өд дөө [^джзстхчш][^мнглбврдцөүе]өд
SFX 02 0 өө [мнглбвр][мнглбвр]өд
SFX 02 ид дөө [жчш]ид
SFX 02 0 өө [^жчш]ид
SFX 02 0 өө [джзстхчш][дц][өи]д
SFX 02 0 өө [өиеүй]нд
SFX 02 0 өө [^дөйиетжзсшцчхмнгбвркфл]
SFX 02 0 өө -д
SFX 02 0 гөө [иөе]ө
SFX 02 0 өө нөд
SFX 02 0 өө [дтжзсшцчхмглбврьй]д
SFX 02 0 өө [үөе][үө]д
SFX 02 0 өө [тжзсшцчхмнгбвркф]
SFX 02 өл лөө [^джзтчцш]төл
SFX 02 0 өө [джзтчцш]төл
SFX 02 0 өө [^т].л
SFX 02 0 ө [^иө][иөе]
SFX 02 0 гөө й

SFX 03 Y 20
SFX 03 эд дээ [^джзстхчш][дц]эд
SFX 03 эд дээ [джзстхчш][^мнглбврдцэүе]эд
SFX 03 эд дээ [^джзстхчш][^мнглбврдцэүе]эд
SFX 03 0 ээ [мнглбвр][мнглбвр]эд
SFX 03 ид дээ [жчш]ид
SFX 03 0 ээ [^жчш]ид
SFX 03 0 ээ [джзстхчш][дц][эи]д
SFX 03 0 ээ [эиеюүй]нд
SFX 03 0 ээ [^дэйиетжзсшцчхмнгбвркфл]
SFX 03 0 ээ -д
SFX 03 0 ээ нэд
SFX 03 0 гээ [иэе]э
SFX 03 0 ээ [дтжзсшцчхмглбвркфьйе]д
SFX 03 0 ээ [үэе][үэ]д
SFX 03 0 ээ [тжзсшцчхмнгбвркф]
SFX 03 эл лээ [^джзтчцш]тэл
SFX 03 0 ээ [джзтчцш]тэл
SFX 03 0 ээ [^т].л
SFX 03 0 э [^иэ][иэе]
SFX 03 0 гээ й

SFX a0 Y 10
SFX a0 0 -ын .
SFX a0 0 -ынх/70 .
SFX a0 0 -ынхан/70 .
SFX a0 0 -д/00 .
SFX a0 0 -аа .
SFX a0 0 -ыг/00 .
SFX a0 0 -аас/00 .
SFX a0 0 -аар/00 .
SFX a0 0 -тай/70 .
SFX a0 0 -гүй/73 .

SFX a1 Y 10
SFX a1 0 -ын .
SFX a1 0 -ынх/71 .
SFX a1 0 -ынхон/71 .
SFX a1 0 -д/01 .
SFX a1 0 -оо .
SFX a1 0 -ыг/01 .
SFX a1 0 -оос/01 .
SFX a1 0 -оор/01 .
SFX a1 0 -той/71 .
SFX a1 0 -гүй/73 .

SFX a2 Y 10
SFX a2 0 -ийн .
SFX a2 0 -ийнх/72 .
SFX a2 0 -ийнхөн/72 .
SFX a2 0 -д/02 .
SFX a2 0 -өө .
SFX a2 0 -ийг/02 .
SFX a2 0 -өөс/02 .
SFX a2 0 -өөр/02 .
SFX a2 0 -тэй/72 .
SFX a2 0 -гүй/73 .

SFX a3 Y 10
SFX a3 0 -ийн .
SFX a3 0 -ийнх/73 .
SFX a3 0 -ийнхэн/73 .
SFX a3 0 -д/03 .
SFX a3 0 -ээ .
SFX a3 0 -ийг/03 .
SFX a3 0 -ээс/03 .
SFX a3 0 -ээр/03 .
SFX a3 0 -тэй/73 .
SFX a3 0 -гүй/73 .

SFX b0 Y 10
SFX b0 0 -ны .
SFX b0 0 -ных/70 .
SFX b0 0 -ныхан/70 .
SFX b0 0 -д/00 .
SFX b0 0 -аа .
SFX b0 0 -г/00 .
SFX b0 0 -аас/00 .
SFX b0 0 -аар/00 .
SFX b0 0 -тай/70 .
SFX b0 0 -гүй/73 .

SFX b1 Y 10
SFX b1 0 -ны .
SFX b1 0 -ных/71 .
SFX b1 0 -ныхон/71 .
SFX b1 0 -д/01 .
SFX b1 0 -г/01 .
SFX b1 0 -оо .
SFX b1 0 -оос/01 .
SFX b1 0 -оор/01 .
SFX b1 0 -той/71 .
SFX b1 0 -гүй/73 .

SFX b2 Y 10
SFX b2 0 -ний .
SFX b2 0 -нийх/72 .
SFX b2 0 -нийхөн/72 .
SFX b2 0 -д/02 .
SFX b2 0 -г/02 .
SFX b2 0 -өө .
SFX b2 0 -өөс/02 .
SFX b2 0 -өөр/02 .
SFX b2 0 -тэй/72 .
SFX b2 0 -гүй/73 .

SFX b3 Y 10
SFX b3 0 -ний .
SFX b3 0 -нийх/73 .
SFX b3 0 -нийхэн/73 .
SFX b3 0 -д/03 .
SFX b3 0 -г/03 .
SFX b3 0 -ээ .
SFX b3 0 -ээс/03 .
SFX b3 0 -ээр/03 .
SFX b3 0 -тэй/73 .
SFX b3 0 -гүй/73 .

SFX c0 Y 10
SFX c0 0 -н .
SFX c0 0 -нх/70 .
SFX c0 0 -нхан/70 .
SFX c0 0 -д/00 .
SFX c0 0 -г/00 .
SFX c0 0 -аа .
SFX c0 0 -аас/00 .
SFX c0 0 -аар/00 .
SFX c0 0 -тай/70 .
SFX c0 0 -гүй/73 .

SFX c1 Y 10
SFX c1 0 -н .
SFX c1 0 -нх/71 .
SFX c1 0 -нхон/71 .
SFX c1 0 -д/01 .
SFX c1 0 -г/01 .
SFX c1 0 -оо .
SFX c1 0 -оос/01 .
SFX c1 0 -оор/01 .
SFX c1 0 -той/71 .
SFX c1 0 -гүй/73 .

SFX c2 Y 10
SFX c2 0 -н .
SFX c2 0 -нх/72 .
SFX c2 0 -нхөн/72 .
SFX c2 0 -д/02 .
SFX c2 0 -г/02 .
SFX c2 0 -өө .
SFX c2 0 -өөс/02 .
SFX c2 0 -өөр/02 .
SFX c2 0 -тэй/72 .
SFX c2 0 -гүй/73 .

SFX c3 Y 10
SFX c3 0 -н .
SFX c3 0 -нх/73 .
SFX c3 0 -нхэн/73 .
SFX c3 0 -д/03 .
SFX c3 0 -г/03 .
SFX c3 0 -ээ .
SFX c3 0 -ээс/03 .
SFX c3 0 -ээр/03 .
SFX c3 0 -тэй/73 .
SFX c3 0 -гүй/73 .

SFX d0 Y 10
SFX d0 0 -ны .
SFX d0 0 -ных/70 .
SFX d0 0 -ныхан/70 .
SFX d0 0 -д/00 .
SFX d0 0 -ыг/00 .
SFX d0 0 -аас/00 .
SFX d0 0 -аа .
SFX d0 0 -аар/00 .
SFX d0 0 -тай/70 .
SFX d0 0 -гүй/73 .

SFX d1 Y 10
SFX d1 0 -ны .
SFX d1 0 -ных/71 .
SFX d1 0 -ныхон/71 .
SFX d1 0 -д/01 .
SFX d1 0 -ыг/01 .
SFX d1 0 -оос/01 .
SFX d1 0 -оо .
SFX d1 0 -оор/01 .
SFX d1 0 -той/71 .
SFX d1 0 -гүй/73 .

SFX d2 Y 10
SFX d2 0 -ний .
SFX d2 0 -нийх/72 .
SFX d2 0 -нийхөн/72 .
SFX d2 0 -д/02 .
SFX d2 0 -ийг/02 .
SFX d2 0 -өөс/02 .
SFX d2 0 -өө .
SFX d2 0 -өөр/02 .
SFX d2 0 -тэй/72 .
SFX d2 0 -гүй/73 .

SFX d3 Y 10
SFX d3 0 -ний .
SFX d3 0 -нийх/73 .
SFX d3 0 -нийхэн/73 .
SFX d3 0 -д/03 .
SFX d3 0 -ийг/03 .
SFX d3 0 -ээс/03 .
SFX d3 0 -ээ .
SFX d3 0 -ээр/03 .
SFX d3 0 -тэй/73 .
SFX d3 0 -гүй/73 .

SFX e0 Y 10
SFX e0 0 -ийн .
SFX e0 0 -ийнх/70 .
SFX e0 0 -ийнхан/70 .
SFX e0 0 -д/00 .
SFX e0 0 -ийг/00 .
SFX e0 0 -аа .
SFX e0 0 -аас/00 .
SFX e0 0 -аар/00 .
SFX e0 0 -тай/70 .
SFX e0 0 -гүй/73 .

SFX e1 Y 10
SFX e1 0 -ийн .
SFX e1 0 -ийнх/71 .
SFX e1 0 -ийнхон/71 .
SFX e1 0 -д/01 .
SFX e1 0 -ийг/01 .
SFX e1 0 -оо .
SFX e1 0 -оос/01 .
SFX e1 0 -оор/01 .
SFX e1 0 -той/71 .
SFX e1 0 -гүй/73 .

SFX e2 Y 10
SFX e2 0 -ийн .
SFX e2 0 -ийнх/72 .
SFX e2 0 -ийнхөн/72 .
SFX e2 0 -д/02 .
SFX e2 0 -ийг/02 .
SFX e2 0 -өө .
SFX e2 0 -өөс/02 .
SFX e2 0 -өөр/02 .
SFX e2 0 -тэй/72 .
SFX e2 0 -гүй/73 .

SFX e3 Y 10
SFX e3 0 -ийн .
SFX e3 0 -ийнх/73 .
SFX e3 0 -ийнхэн/73 .
SFX e3 0 -д/03 .
SFX e3 0 -ийг/03 .
SFX e3 0 -ээ .
SFX e3 0 -ээс/03 .
SFX e3 0 -ээр/03 .
SFX e3 0 -тэй/73 .
SFX e3 0 -гүй/73 .

SFX f0 Y 10
SFX f0 0 -ны .
SFX f0 0 -ных/70 .
SFX f0 0 -ныхан/70 .
SFX f0 0 -д/00 .
SFX f0 0 -ийг/00 .
SFX f0 0 -аас/00 .
SFX f0 0 -аа .
SFX f0 0 -аар/00 .
SFX f0 0 -тай/70 .
SFX f0 0 -гүй/73 .

SFX f1 Y 10
SFX f1 0 -ны .
SFX f1 0 -ных/71 .
SFX f1 0 -ныхон/71 .
SFX f1 0 -д/01 .
SFX f1 0 -ийг/01 .
SFX f1 0 -оос/01 .
SFX f1 0 -оо .
SFX f1 0 -оор/01 .
SFX f1 0 -той/71 .
SFX f1 0 -гүй/73 .

SFX f2 Y 10
SFX f2 0 -ний .
SFX f2 0 -нийх/72 .
SFX f2 0 -нийхөн/72 .
SFX f2 0 -д/02 .
SFX f2 0 -ийг/02 .
SFX f2 0 -өөс/02 .
SFX f2 0 -өө .
SFX f2 0 -өөр/02 .
SFX f2 0 -тэй/72 .
SFX f2 0 -гүй/73 .

SFX f3 Y 10
SFX f3 0 -ний .
SFX f3 0 -нийх/73 .
SFX f3 0 -нийхэн/73 .
SFX f3 0 -д/03 .
SFX f3 0 -ийг/03 .
SFX f3 0 -ээс/03 .
SFX f3 0 -ээ .
SFX f3 0 -ээр/03 .
SFX f3 0 -тэй/73 .
SFX f3 0 -гүй/73 .

SFX g0 Y 10
SFX g0 0 -ын .
SFX g0 0 -ынх/70 .
SFX g0 0 -ынхан/70 .
SFX g0 0 -т/00 .
SFX g0 0 -ыг/00 .
SFX g0 0 -аа .
SFX g0 0 -аас/00 .
SFX g0 0 -аар/00 .
SFX g0 0 -тай/70 .
SFX g0 0 -гүй/73 .

SFX g1 Y 10
SFX g1 0 -ын .
SFX g1 0 -ынх/71 .
SFX g1 0 -ынхон/71 .
SFX g1 0 -т/01 .
SFX g1 0 -ыг/01 .
SFX g1 0 -оо .
SFX g1 0 -оос/01 .
SFX g1 0 -оор/01 .
SFX g1 0 -той/71 .
SFX g1 0 -гүй/73 .

SFX g2 Y 10
SFX g2 0 -ийн .
SFX g2 0 -ийнх/72 .
SFX g2 0 -ийнхөн/72 .
SFX g2 0 -т/02 .
SFX g2 0 -ийг/02 .
SFX g2 0 -өө .
SFX g2 0 -өөс/02 .
SFX g2 0 -өөр/02 .
SFX g2 0 -тэй/72 .
SFX g2 0 -гүй/73 .

SFX g3 Y 10
SFX g3 0 -ийн .
SFX g3 0 -ийнх/73 .
SFX g3 0 -ийнхэн/73 .
SFX g3 0 -т/03 .
SFX g3 0 -ийг/03 .
SFX g3 0 -ээ .
SFX g3 0 -ээс/03 .
SFX g3 0 -ээр/03 .
SFX g3 0 -тэй/73 .
SFX g3 0 -гүй/73 .

SFX h0 Y 10
SFX h0 0 -ы .
SFX h0 0 -ых/70 .
SFX h0 0 -ыхан/70 .
SFX h0 0 -д/00 .
SFX h0 0 -ыг/00 .
SFX h0 0 -аа .
SFX h0 0 -аас/00 .
SFX h0 0 -аар/00 .
SFX h0 0 -тай/70 .
SFX h0 0 -гүй/73 .

SFX h1 Y 10
SFX h1 0 -ы .
SFX h1 0 -ых/71 .
SFX h1 0 -ыхон/71 .
SFX h1 0 -д/01 .
SFX h1 0 -ыг/01 .
SFX h1 0 -оо .
SFX h1 0 -оос/01 .
SFX h1 0 -оор/01 .
SFX h1 0 -той/71 .
SFX h1 0 -гүй/73 .

SFX h2 Y 10
SFX h2 0 -ий .
SFX h2 0 -ийх/72 .
SFX h2 0 -ийхөн/72 .
SFX h2 0 -д/02 .
SFX h2 0 -ийг/02 .
SFX h2 0 -өө .
SFX h2 0 -өөс/02 .
SFX h2 0 -өөр/02 .
SFX h2 0 -тэй/72 .
SFX h2 0 -гүй/73 .

SFX h3 Y 10
SFX h3 0 -ий .
SFX h3 0 -ийх/73 .
SFX h3 0 -ийхэн/73 .
SFX h3 0 -д/03 .
SFX h3 0 -ийг/03 .
SFX h3 0 -ээ .
SFX h3 0 -ээс/03 .
SFX h3 0 -ээр/03 .
SFX h3 0 -тэй/73 .
SFX h3 0 -гүй/73 .

SFX i0 Y 10
SFX i0 0 -ийн .
SFX i0 0 -ийнх/70 .
SFX i0 0 -ийнхан/70 .
SFX i0 0 -д/00 .
SFX i0 0 -г/00 .
SFX i0 0 -аас/00 .
SFX i0 0 -аа .
SFX i0 0 -аар/00 .
SFX i0 0 -тай/70 .
SFX i0 0 -гүй/73 .

SFX i1 Y 10
SFX i1 0 -ийн .
SFX i1 0 -ийнх/71 .
SFX i1 0 -ийнхон/71 .
SFX i1 0 -д/01 .
SFX i1 0 -г/01 .
SFX i1 0 -оос/01 .
SFX i1 0 -оо .
SFX i1 0 -оор/01 .
SFX i1 0 -той/71 .
SFX i1 0 -гүй/73 .

SFX i2 Y 10
SFX i2 0 -ийн .
SFX i2 0 -ийнх/72 .
SFX i2 0 -ийнхөн/72 .
SFX i2 0 -д/02 .
SFX i2 0 -г/02 .
SFX i2 0 -өөс/02 .
SFX i2 0 -өө .
SFX i2 0 -өөр/02 .
SFX i2 0 -тэй/72 .
SFX i2 0 -гүй/73 .

SFX i3 Y 10
SFX i3 0 -ийн .
SFX i3 0 -ийнх/73 .
SFX i3 0 -ийнхэн/73 .
SFX i3 0 -д/03 .
SFX i3 0 -г/03 .
SFX i3 0 -ээс/03 .
SFX i3 0 -ээ .
SFX i3 0 -ээр/03 .
SFX i3 0 -тэй/73 .
SFX i3 0 -гүй/73 .

SFX k0 Y 10
SFX k0 0 -ийн .
SFX k0 0 -ийнх/70 .
SFX k0 0 -ийнхан/70 .
SFX k0 0 -т/00 .
SFX k0 0 -ийг/00 .
SFX k0 0 -аа .
SFX k0 0 -аас/00 .
SFX k0 0 -аар/00 .
SFX k0 0 -тай/70 .
SFX k0 0 -гүй/73 .

SFX k1 Y 10
SFX k1 0 -ийн .
SFX k1 0 -ийнх/71 .
SFX k1 0 -ийнхон/71 .
SFX k1 0 -т/01 .
SFX k1 0 -ийг/01 .
SFX k1 0 -оо .
SFX k1 0 -оос/01 .
SFX k1 0 -оор/01 .
SFX k1 0 -той/71 .
SFX k1 0 -гүй/73 .

SFX k2 Y 10
SFX k2 0 -ийн .
SFX k2 0 -ийнх/72 .
SFX k2 0 -ийнхөн/72 .
SFX k2 0 -т/02 .
SFX k2 0 -ийг/02 .
SFX k2 0 -өө .
SFX k2 0 -өөс/02 .
SFX k2 0 -өөр/02 .
SFX k2 0 -тэй/72 .
SFX k2 0 -гүй/73 .

SFX k3 Y 10
SFX k3 0 -ийн .
SFX k3 0 -ийнх/73 .
SFX k3 0 -ийнхэн/73 .
SFX k3 0 -т/03 .
SFX k3 0 -ийг/03 .
SFX k3 0 -ээ .
SFX k3 0 -ээс/03 .
SFX k3 0 -ээр/03 .
SFX k3 0 -тэй/73 .
SFX k3 0 -гүй/73 .

SFX l0 Y 10
SFX l0 0 -ны .
SFX l0 0 -ных/70 .
SFX l0 0 -ныхан/70 .
SFX l0 0 -д/00 .
SFX l0 0 -ийг/00 .
SFX l0 0 -аас/00 .
SFX l0 0 -аа .
SFX l0 0 -аар/00 .
SFX l0 0 -тай/70 .
SFX l0 0 -гүй/73 .

SFX l1 Y 10
SFX l1 0 -ны .
SFX l1 0 -ных/71 .
SFX l1 0 -ныхон/71 .
SFX l1 0 -д/01 .
SFX l1 0 -ийг/01 .
SFX l1 0 -оос/01 .
SFX l1 0 -оо .
SFX l1 0 -оор/01 .
SFX l1 0 -той/71 .
SFX l1 0 -гүй/73 .

SFX l2 Y 10
SFX l2 0 -ний .
SFX l2 0 -нийх/72 .
SFX l2 0 -нийхөн/72 .
SFX l2 0 -д/02 .
SFX l2 0 -ийг/02 .
SFX l2 0 -өөс/02 .
SFX l2 0 -өө .
SFX l2 0 -өөр/02 .
SFX l2 0 -тэй/72 .
SFX l2 0 -гүй/73 .

SFX l3 Y 10
SFX l3 0 -ний .
SFX l3 0 -нийх/73 .
SFX l3 0 -нийхэн/73 .
SFX l3 0 -д/03 .
SFX l3 0 -ийг/03 .
SFX l3 0 -ээс/03 .
SFX l3 0 -ээ .
SFX l3 0 -ээр/03 .
SFX l3 0 -тэй/73 .
SFX l3 0 -гүй/73 .

SFX m0 Y 8
SFX m0 0 -рын .
SFX m0 0 -рынх/70 .
SFX m0 0 -рт/00 .
SFX m0 0 -рыг/00 .
SFX m0 0 -раа .
SFX m0 0 -раас/00 .
SFX m0 0 -раар/00 .
SFX m0 0 -р/0408 .

SFX m3 Y 8
SFX m3 0 -рийн .
SFX m3 0 -рийнх/73 .
SFX m3 0 -рт/03 .
SFX m3 0 -рийг/03 .
SFX m3 0 -рээ .
SFX m3 0 -рээс/03 .
SFX m3 0 -рээр/03 .
SFX m3 0 -р/0708 .

SFX m1 Y 2
SFX m1 0 -ууд/040870 .
SFX m1 0 -уудынх/040870 .

SFX m2 Y 2
SFX m2 0 -үүд/070873 .
SFX m2 0 -үүдийнх/070873 .

SFX o0 Y 8
SFX o0 0 -ны .
SFX o0 0 -ных/70 .
SFX o0 0 -ныхан/70 .
SFX o0 0 -нд/00 .
SFX o0 0 -ныг/00 .
SFX o0 0 -наас/00 .
SFX o0 0 -наар/00 .
SFX o0 0 -н/0408 .

SFX o1 Y 8
SFX o1 0 -ны .
SFX o1 0 -ных/71 .
SFX o1 0 -ныхон/71 .
SFX o1 0 -нд/01 .
SFX o1 0 -ныг/01 .
SFX o1 0 -ноос/01 .
SFX o1 0 -ноор/01 .
SFX o1 0 -н/0508 .
